Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 16
ELECTION OFFENSES

1-13.5-1601. Applicability of criminal penalties.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except for parts 2 and 3 of article 13 of this title, election offenses and penalties described under article 13 of this title apply to elections conducted under this article.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 57, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 754, § 6, effective June 6.